test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pine_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - пине: # Ordinary nouns 'eye' - full paradigm including MWN
     пине+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: пине
     пине+N+SP+Gen+Indef: пинень
     пине+N+SP+Abl+Indef: пинеда
     пине+N+SP+Dat+Indef: пиненди
     пине+N+SP+Abe+Indef: пинефтома
     пине+N+SP+Comp+Indef: пинешка
     пине+N+SP+Ine+Indef: пинеса
     пине+N+SP+Ela+Indef: пинеста
     пине+N+SP+Ill+Indef: пинес
     пине+N+SP+Prl+Indef: пинева
     пине+N+SP+Tra+Indef: пинекс
     пине+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: пинезе
     пине+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: пинене
     пине+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: пинезень
     пине+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: пиненень
     пине+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [пинезенди, пинезти]
     пине+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: пинененди
     пине+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: пинедон
     пине+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: пинефтомон
     пине+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: пинешкан
     пине+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: пинесон
     пине+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: пинестон
     пине+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: пинезон
     пине+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: пиневан
     пине+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: пинеце
     пине+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: пинетне
     пине+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: пинецень
     пине+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: пинетнень
     пине+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: пинедот
     пине+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: пинефтомот
     пине+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: пинешкат
     пине+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: пинесот
     пине+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: пинестот
     пине+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: пинезт
     пине+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: пиневат
     пине+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: пинец
     пине+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: пиненза
     пине+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: пиненц
     пине+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: пинензон
     пине+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: пиненцты
     пине+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: пинензонды
     пине+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: пинедонза
     пине+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: пинефтомонза
     пине+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: пинешканза
     пине+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: пинесонза
     пине+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: пинестонза
     пине+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: пинезонза
     пине+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: пиневанза
     пине+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: пиненьке
     пине+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: пиненьконь
     пине+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: пиненьконди
     пине+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: пинедонк
     пине+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: пинефтомонк
     пине+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: пинешканк
     пине+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: пинесонк
     пине+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: пинестонк
     пине+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: пинезонк
     пине+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: пиневанк
     пине+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: пиненте
     пине+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: пинентень
     пине+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: пинентенди
     пине+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: пинедонт
     пине+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: пинефтомонт
     пине+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: пинешкант
     пине+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: пинесонт
     пине+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: пинестонт
     пине+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: пинезонт
     пине+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: пиневант
     пине+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: пинесна
     пине+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: пинеснон
     пине+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: пинеснонды
     пине+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: пинедост
     пине+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: пинефтомост
     пине+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: пинешкаст
     пине+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: пинесост
     пине+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: пинестост
     пине+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: пинезост
     пине+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: пиневаст
     пине+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: пинет
     пине+N+Sg+Nom+Def: пинесь
     пине+N+Sg+Gen+Def: пинеть
     пине+N+Sg+Dat+Def: пинети
     пине+N+Pl+Nom+Def: пинетне
     пине+N+Pl+Gen+Def: пинетнень
     пине+N+Pl+Dat+Def: пинетненди    
